Missouri, session 2026, SB1700.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.663, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 160.663,
to read as follows:
160.663. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Anti-intruder door lock", a mechanical or
electronic door-locking mechanism on an interior door that
is designed to keep an intruder from entering an interior
room that shall:
(a) Be capable of:
a. Locking from inside or outside the room;
b. Unlocking from outside the room with a key or other
approved means; and
(b) Control access to the room;
(2) "Exterior door or entryway", any location of
normal ingress and egress into or out of a school building;
(3) "Interior door", an egress door from a classroom,
office, or other occupied room that provides access to the
interior of a building;

SB 1700 2
(4) "Master key box", an exterior secure master key
box that meets the standards prescribed under Underwriters
Laboratories Standard 1037 for use by fire protection and
law enforcement.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, each
school district and charter school shall equip each interior
door with an anti-intruder door lock.
3. (1) A school district or charter school may equip
each school with one or more master key boxes to contain the
necessary keys and access tools for fire protection and law
enforcement agencies to gain access to exterior or interior
doors or entryways, including those equipped with an anti-
intruder door lock required under this section.
(2) On or before July 1, 2028, a school district or
charter school shall equip each school with at least one
master key box as provided in subsections 7 to 10 of this
section.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
the contrary, a school district or charter school shall not
be required to equip an interior door with an anti-intruder
door lock under this section unless the general assembly
specifically appropriates moneys to cover all costs related
to equipping such door or entryway with such lock.
5. (1) Each interior door installed after August 28,
2029, shall be equipped with the required anti-intruder door
lock.
(2) A school district or charter school may receive
donations of master key boxes and moneys for the purchase of
master key boxes.
(3) A school district or charter school may receive
donations of anti-intruder door locks and moneys for the
purchase of anti-intruder door locks.

SB 1700 3
6. Before or in conjunction with equipping interior
doors with anti-intruder door locks, each school district
and charter school shall develop and implement school
building access policies and practices that control access
to individual classrooms.
7. On or before July 1, 2028, each school district and
charter school shall install at each school at least one
master key box. Each master key box shall be installed at
an appropriate location to permit law enforcement officers
emergency access to each building and classroom or other
room on the school grounds. The school district or charter
school shall determine the precise location of each key box
after consultation with local law enforcement agencies of
the jurisdiction in which the school building is located.
Each school district or charter school shall provide each
local law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which
the school building is located with a key or access code
that permits access to the contents of the master key box.
8. Each master key box installed pursuant to
subsection 7 of this section shall contain:
(1) The keys and other access control devices
necessary to access each building and room on the entire
school grounds; and
(2) Accurate maps of the entire school grounds that
identify and label:
(a) Access points to each building's interior,
including rooms, doors, stairwells, and hallways. The maps
shall include the identifiers or names utilized by staff and
students to identify the rooms, doors, stairwells, and
hallways on the map;

SB 1700 4
(b) Locations of critical utilities, master key boxes,
automated external defibrillators, trauma kits, and other
emergency response aids; and
(c) Areas at or near each building, including parking
areas, athletic fields, surrounding roads, outbuildings, and
neighboring properties.
9. Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 610 to the
contrary, the contents of a master key box and the
information contained therein is not a public record and
shall not be made available for public examination.
10. An employee of a school district or charter school
is immune from civil liability for damages arising out of
the installation and use of master key boxes required by
this section unless the employee acted with gross negligence
or bad faith.
✓